Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.123

Flexible spending administrative account—Salary reduction account—School employees' benefits board flexible spending and dependent care administrative account—School employees' benefits board salary reduction account.

(1) For the public employees' benefits board program, the flexible spending administrative account is created in the custody of the state treasurer.

(a) All receipts from the following must be deposited in the account:

(i) Revenues from employing agencies for costs associated with operating the *medical flexible spending arrangement program and the dependent care assistance program provided through the salary reduction plan authorized under this chapter; and

(ii) Unclaimed moneys at the end of the plan year after all timely submitted claims for that plan year have been processed. Expenditures from the account may be used only for administrative and other expenses related to operating the *medical flexible spending arrangement program and the dependent care assistance program provided through the salary reduction plan authorized under this chapter. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

(b) The salary reduction account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. Employee salary reductions paid to reimburse participants or service providers for benefits provided by the *medical flexible spending arrangement program and the dependent care assistance program provided through the salary reduction plan authorized under this chapter shall be paid from the salary reduction account. The funds held by the state to pay for benefits provided by the *medical flexible spending arrangement program and the dependent care assistance program provided through the salary reduction plan authorized under this chapter shall be deposited in the salary reduction account. Unclaimed moneys remaining in the salary reduction account at the end of a plan year after all timely submitted claims for that plan year have been processed shall become a part of the flexible spending administrative account. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is not subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW and an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

(c) Program claims reserves and money necessary for start-up costs transferred from the public employees' and retirees' insurance account established in RCW 41.05.120 may be deposited in the flexible spending administrative account. Moneys in excess of the amount necessary for administrative and operating expenses of the *medical flexible spending arrangement program may be transferred to the public employees' and retirees' insurance account.

(d) The authority may periodically bill employing agencies for costs associated with operating the *medical flexible spending arrangement program and the dependent care assistance program provided through the salary reduction plan authorized under this chapter.

(2) For the school employees' benefits board program, the school employees' benefits board flexible spending and dependent care administrative account is created in the custody of the state treasurer.

(a) All receipts from the following must be deposited in the account:

(i) Revenues from school employees' benefits board organizations for costs associated with operating the school employees' benefits board *medical flexible spending arrangement program and the school employees' benefits board dependent care assistance program provided through the salary reduction plan authorized under this chapter; and

(ii) Unclaimed moneys at the end of the plan year after all timely submitted claims for that plan year have been processed. Expenditures from the account may be used only for administrative and other expenses related to operating the school employees' benefits board *medical flexible spending arrangement program and the school employees' benefits board dependent care assistance program provided through the salary reduction plan authorized under this chapter. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

(b) The school employees' benefits board salary reduction account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. School employee salary reductions paid to reimburse participants or service providers for benefits provided by the school employees' benefits board *medical flexible spending arrangement program and the school employees' benefits board dependent care assistance program provided through the salary reduction plan authorized under this chapter shall be paid from the school employees' benefits board salary reduction account. The funds held by the state to pay for benefits provided by the school employees' benefits board *medical flexible spending arrangement program and the school employees' benefits board dependent care assistance program provided through the salary reduction plan authorized under this chapter shall be deposited in the school employees' benefits board salary reduction account. Unclaimed moneys remaining in the school employees' benefits board salary reduction account at the end of a plan year after all timely submitted claims for that plan year have been processed shall become a part of the school employees' benefits board flexible spending and dependent care administrative account. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is not subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW and an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

(c) Program claims reserves and money necessary for start-up costs transferred from the school employees' insurance account established in RCW 41.05.120 may be deposited in the school employees' benefits board flexible spending and dependent care administrative account. Moneys in excess of the amount necessary for administrative and operating expenses of the school employees' benefits board *medical flexible spending arrangement and the school employees' benefits board dependent care assistance program may be transferred to the school employees' insurance account.

(d) The authority may periodically bill school employees' benefits board organizations for costs associated with operating the school employees' benefits board *medical flexible spending arrangement program and the school employees' benefits board dependent care assistance program provided through the salary reduction plan authorized under this chapter.

[ 2018 c 260 s 26; 2008 c 229 s 6; 2005 c 143 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The term "medical flexible spending arrangement" was changed to "flexible spending arrangement" by 2023 c 51 s 3.

Effective date—2008 c 229: See note following RCW 41.05.295.